Illinois, session 104th, SB3439.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Section 35 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/35)7    Sec. 35. Display of license; confiscation; violation as 8felony. 9    (a) Each video gaming terminal shall be licensed by the 10Board before placement or operation on the premises of a 11licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 12licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 13establishment, or licensed veterans establishment. The license 14of each video gaming terminal shall be maintained at the 15location where the video gaming terminal is operated. Failure 16to do so is a petty offense with a fine not to exceed $100. Any 17licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 18licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 19establishment, or licensed veterans establishment used for the 20conduct of gambling games in violation of this Act shall be 21considered a gambling place in violation of Section 28-3 of 22the Criminal Code of 2012. Every gambling device found in a 23licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment,   SB3439- 2 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 2establishment, or licensed veterans establishment operating 3gambling games in violation of this Act shall be subject to 4seizure, confiscation, and destruction as provided in Section 528-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. Any license issued under the 6Liquor Control Act of 1934 to any owner or operator of a 7licensed establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, 8licensed large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 9establishment, or licensed veterans establishment that 10operates or permits the operation of a video gaming terminal 11within its establishment in violation of this Act shall be 12immediately revoked. No person may own, operate, have in his 13or her possession or custody or under his or her control, or 14permit to be kept in any place under his or her possession or 15control, any device that awards credits and contains a 16circuit, meter, or switch capable of removing and recording 17the removal of credits when the award of credits is dependent 18upon chance. 19    Nothing in this Section shall be deemed to prohibit the 20use of a game device only if the game device is used in an 21activity that is not gambling under subsection (b) of Section 2228-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 23    A violation of this Section is a Class 4 felony. All 24devices that are owned, operated, or possessed in violation of 25this Section are hereby declared to be public nuisances and 26shall be subject to seizure, confiscation, and destruction as   SB3439- 3 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1provided in Section 28-5 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 2    The provisions of this Section do not apply to devices or 3electronic video game terminals licensed pursuant to this Act. 4A video gaming terminal operated for amusement only and 5bearing a valid amusement tax sticker shall not be subject to 6this Section until 30 days after the Board establishes that 7the central communications system is functional. 8    (b) (1) The odds of winning each video game shall be posted 9on or near each video gaming terminal. The manner in which the 10odds are calculated and how they are posted shall be 11determined by the Board by rule.12    (2) No video gaming terminal licensed under this Act may 13be played except during the legal hours of operation allowed 14for the consumption of alcoholic beverages at the licensed 15establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or licensed 16veterans establishment. A licensed establishment, licensed 17fraternal establishment, or licensed veterans establishment 18that violates this subsection is subject to termination of its 19license by the Board. 20(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 21    Section 10. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 22changing Sections 28-1 and 28-2 as follows: 23    (720 ILCS 5/28-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-1)24    Sec. 28-1. Gambling.   SB3439- 4 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1    (a) A person commits gambling when he or she:2        (1) knowingly plays a game of chance or skill for 3    money or other thing of value, unless excepted in 4    subsection (b) of this Section;5        (2) knowingly makes a wager upon the result of any 6    game, contest, or any political nomination, appointment or 7    election;8        (3) knowingly operates, keeps, owns, uses, purchases, 9    exhibits, rents, sells, bargains for the sale or lease of, 10    manufactures or distributes any gambling device;11        (4) contracts to have or give himself or herself or 12    another the option to buy or sell, or contracts to buy or 13    sell, at a future time, any grain or other commodity 14    whatsoever, or any stock or security of any company, where 15    it is at the time of making such contract intended by both 16    parties thereto that the contract to buy or sell, or the 17    option, whenever exercised, or the contract resulting 18    therefrom, shall be settled, not by the receipt or 19    delivery of such property, but by the payment only of 20    differences in prices thereof; however, the issuance, 21    purchase, sale, exercise, endorsement or guarantee, by or 22    through a person registered with the Secretary of State 23    pursuant to Section 8 of the Illinois Securities Law of 24    1953, or by or through a person exempt from such 25    registration under said Section 8, of a put, call, or 26    other option to buy or sell securities which have been   SB3439- 5 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1    registered with the Secretary of State or which are exempt 2    from such registration under Section 3 of the Illinois 3    Securities Law of 1953 is not gambling within the meaning 4    of this paragraph (4);5        (5) knowingly owns or possesses any book, instrument, 6    or apparatus by means of which bets or wagers have been, or 7    are, recorded or registered, or knowingly possesses any 8    money which he or she has received in the course of a bet 9    or wager;10        (6) knowingly sells pools upon the result of any game 11    or contest of skill or chance, political nomination, 12    appointment, or election;13        (7) knowingly sets up or promotes any lottery or 14    sells, offers to sell, or transfers any ticket or share 15    for any lottery;16        (8) knowingly sets up or promotes any policy game or 17    sells, offers to sell, or knowingly possesses or transfers 18    any policy ticket, slip, record, document, or other 19    similar device;20        (9) knowingly drafts, prints, or publishes any lottery 21    ticket or share, or any policy ticket, slip, record, 22    document, or similar device, except for such activity 23    related to lotteries, bingo games, and raffles authorized 24    by and conducted in accordance with the laws of Illinois 25    or any other state or foreign government;26        (10) knowingly advertises any lottery or policy game,   SB3439- 6 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1    except for such activity related to lotteries, bingo 2    games, and raffles authorized by and conducted in 3    accordance with the laws of Illinois or any other state;4        (11) knowingly transmits information as to wagers, 5    betting odds, or changes in betting odds by telephone, 6    telegraph, radio, semaphore, or similar means; or 7    knowingly installs or maintains equipment for the 8    transmission or receipt of such information; except that 9    nothing in this subdivision (11) prohibits transmission or 10    receipt of such information for use in news reporting of 11    sporting events or contests; or12        (12) knowingly establishes, maintains, or operates an 13    Internet site that permits a person to play a game of 14    chance or skill for money or other thing of value by means 15    of the Internet or to make a wager upon the result of any 16    game, contest, political nomination, appointment, or 17    election by means of the Internet. This item (12) does not 18    apply to activities referenced in items (6), (6.1), (8), 19    (8.1), and (15) of subsection (b) of this Section. 20    (b) Participants in any of the following activities shall 21not be convicted of gambling:22        (1) Agreements to compensate for loss caused by the 23    happening of chance, including, without limitation, 24    contracts of indemnity or guaranty and life or health or 25    accident insurance.26        (2) Offers of prizes, award, or compensation to the   SB3439- 7 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1    actual contestants in any bona fide contest for the 2    determination of skill, speed, strength, or endurance or 3    to the owners of animals or vehicles entered in such 4    contest.5        (3) Pari-mutuel betting as authorized by the law of 6    this State.7        (4) Manufacture of gambling devices, including the 8    acquisition of essential parts therefor and the assembly 9    thereof, for transportation in interstate or foreign 10    commerce to any place outside this State when such 11    transportation is not prohibited by any applicable Federal 12    law; or the manufacture, distribution, or possession of 13    video gaming terminals, as defined in the Video Gaming 14    Act, by manufacturers, distributors, and terminal 15    operators licensed to do so under the Video Gaming Act.16        (5) The game commonly known as "bingo", when conducted 17    in accordance with the Bingo License and Tax Act.18        (6) Lotteries when conducted by the State of Illinois 19    in accordance with the Illinois Lottery Law. This 20    exemption includes any activity conducted by the 21    Department of Revenue to sell lottery tickets pursuant to 22    the provisions of the Illinois Lottery Law and its rules.23        (6.1) The purchase of lottery tickets through the 24    Internet for a lottery conducted by the State of Illinois 25    under the program established in Section 7.12 of the 26    Illinois Lottery Law.   SB3439- 8 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1        (7) Possession of an antique slot machine that is 2    neither used nor intended to be used in the operation or 3    promotion of any unlawful gambling activity or enterprise. 4    For the purpose of this subparagraph (b)(7), an antique 5    slot machine is one manufactured 25 years ago or earlier.6        (8) Raffles and poker runs when conducted in 7    accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs Act.8        (8.1) The purchase of raffle chances for a raffle 9    conducted in accordance with the Raffles and Poker Runs 10    Act. 11        (9) Charitable games when conducted in accordance with 12    the Charitable Games Act.13        (10) Pull tabs and jar games when conducted under the 14    Illinois Pull Tabs and Jar Games Act.15        (11) Gambling games when authorized by the Illinois 16    Gambling Act.17        (12) Video gaming terminal games at a licensed 18    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 19    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 20    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment when 21    conducted in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 22        (13) Games of skill or chance where money or other 23    things of value can be won but no payment or purchase is 24    required to participate, except where conducted through 25    use of a gambling device or by means of the Internet. 26        (14) Savings promotion raffles authorized under   SB3439- 9 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1    Section 5g of the Illinois Banking Act, Section 7008 of 2    the Savings Bank Act, Section 42.7 of the Illinois Credit 3    Union Act, Section 5136B of the National Bank Act (12 4    U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home Owners' Loan Act (12 5    U.S.C. 1463). 6        (15) Sports wagering when conducted in accordance with 7    the Sports Wagering Act. 8    (c) Sentence.9        (1) Gambling is a Class A misdemeanor. A second or 10    subsequent conviction under subsections (a)(3) through 11    (a)(12), is a Class 4 felony.12        (2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection 13    (c), or anything else contained in this Section to the 14    contrary, a gambling offense involving a device described 15    in item (iii) of subsection (a) of Section 28-2 is a Class 16    4 felony. 17    (d) Circumstantial evidence.18    In prosecutions under this Section circumstantial evidence 19shall have the same validity and weight as in any criminal 20prosecution.21(Source: P.A. 101-31, Article 25, Section 25-915, eff. 226-28-19; 101-31, Article 35, Section 35-80, eff. 6-28-19; 23101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 24    (720 ILCS 5/28-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 28-2)25    Sec. 28-2. Definitions.   SB3439- 10 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1    (a) A "gambling device" is: (i) any clock, tape machine, 2slot machine, or other machines or device for the reception of 3money or other thing of value on chance or skill or upon the 4action of which money or other thing of value is staked, 5hazarded, bet, won, or lost; (ii) or any mechanism, furniture, 6fixture, equipment, or other device designed primarily for use 7in a gambling place; or (iii) any vending or other electronic 8machine or device, including, without limitation, a machine or 9device that awards credits and contains a circuit, meter, or 10switch capable of removing and recording the removal of 11credits that offers a person entry into any contest, 12competition, sweepstakes, scheme, plan, or other selection 13process that involves or is dependent upon an element of 14chance for which the person may receive a gift, award, or other 15item or service of value if that offer is incidental to or 16results from: (A) the purchase of an item or service of value; 17or (B) the purchase or gratuitous receipt of a coupon, 18voucher, certificate, or other similar credit that can be 19redeemed for or applied towards an item or service of value 20from such machine or device or elsewhere. A "gambling device" 21does not include:22        (1) A coin-in-the-slot operated mechanical device 23    played for amusement which rewards the player with the 24    right to replay such mechanical device, which device is so 25    constructed or devised as to make such result of the 26    operation thereof depend in part upon the skill of the   SB3439- 11 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1    player and which returns to the player thereof no money, 2    property, or right to receive money or property.3        (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection 4    (a), a vending machine Vending machines by which full and 5    adequate return is made for the money invested and in 6    which there is no element of chance or hazard.7        (3) A crane game. For the purposes of this paragraph 8    (3), a "crane game" is an amusement device involving 9    skill, if it rewards the player exclusively with 10    merchandise contained within the amusement device proper 11    and limited to toys, novelties, and prizes other than 12    currency, each having a wholesale value which is not more 13    than $25.14        (4) A redemption machine. For the purposes of this 15    paragraph (4), a "redemption machine" is a single-player 16    or multi-player amusement device involving a game, the 17    object of which is throwing, rolling, bowling, shooting, 18    placing, or propelling a ball or other object that is 19    either physical or computer generated on a display or with 20    lights into, upon, or against a hole or other target that 21    is either physical or computer generated on a display or 22    with lights, or stopping, by physical, mechanical, or 23    electronic means, a moving object that is either physical 24    or computer generated on a display or with lights into, 25    upon, or against a hole or other target that is either 26    physical or computer generated on a display or with   SB3439- 12 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1    lights, provided that all of the following conditions are 2    met:3            (A) The outcome of the game is predominantly 4        determined by the skill of the player.5            (B) The award of the prize is based solely upon the 6        player's achieving the object of the game or otherwise 7        upon the player's score.8            (C) Only merchandise prizes are awarded.9            (D) The wholesale value of prizes awarded in lieu 10        of tickets or tokens for single play of the device does 11        not exceed $25.12            (E) The redemption value of tickets, tokens, and 13        other representations of value, which may be 14        accumulated by players to redeem prizes of greater 15        value, for a single play of the device does not exceed 16        $25.17        (5) Video gaming terminals at a licensed 18    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 19    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 20    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment licensed 21    in accordance with the Video Gaming Act. 22    (a-5) "Internet" means an interactive computer service or 23system or an information service, system, or access software 24provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple 25users to a computer server, and includes, but is not limited 26to, an information service, system, or access software   SB3439- 13 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1provider that provides access to a network system commonly 2known as the Internet, or any comparable system or service and 3also includes, but is not limited to, a World Wide Web page, 4newsgroup, message board, mailing list, or chat area on any 5interactive computer service or system or other online 6service.7    (a-6) "Access" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 8Section 17-55.9    (a-7) "Computer" has the meaning ascribed to the term in 10Section 17-0.5. 11    (b) A "lottery" is any scheme or procedure whereby one or 12more prizes are distributed by chance among persons who have 13paid or promised consideration for a chance to win such 14prizes, whether such scheme or procedure is called a lottery, 15raffle, gift, sale, or some other name, excluding savings 16promotion raffles authorized under Section 5g of the Illinois 17Banking Act, Section 7008 of the Savings Bank Act, Section 1842.7 of the Illinois Credit Union Act, Section 5136B of the 19National Bank Act (12 U.S.C. 25a), or Section 4 of the Home 20Owners' Loan Act (12 U.S.C. 1463).21    (c) A "policy game" is any scheme or procedure whereby a 22person promises or guarantees by any instrument, bill, 23certificate, writing, token, or other device that any 24particular number, character, ticket, or certificate shall in 25the event of any contingency in the nature of a lottery entitle 26the purchaser or holder to receive money, property, or   SB3439- 14 -LRB104 20118 LNS 33569 b1evidence of debt.2    (d) It is the intent of item (iii) of subsection (a) of 3this Section to prohibit any mechanism that seeks to avoid 4being considered a gambling device through the use of any 5subterfuge or pretense whatsoever. 6(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-87, eff. 1-1-20; 7102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.